Maine, session 132, LD527.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §288 is amended to read:
§288. Recognizance after commitment
A person committed for not recognizing as aforesaid pursuant to section 285 may be
discharged by a Justice of the Superior Court or a bail commissioner, a bail officer as
defined in section 1003, subsection 1-A, a law enforcement officer as defined in section
1003, subsection 8-B or a corrections officer as defined in Title 25, section 2801-A,
subsection 2, on giving the security required under section 281.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §1003, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Bail officer. "Bail officer" refers to an employee of the judicial branch who is
hired and trained to set and execute bail in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §1003, sub-§8-B is enacted to read:
8-B. Law enforcement officer. "Law enforcement officer" means a sworn police
officer who is certified by the Maine Criminal Justice Academy.
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA §1023, as amended by PL 2023, c. 299, §1, is further amended to
read:
§1023. Bail commissioners; bail officers
1. Authority. A bail commissioner, appointed under this section, or a bail officer shall
set preconviction bail for a defendant in a criminal proceeding in accordance with this
chapter, provided except that a bail commissioner or bail officer may not set preconviction
bail for a defendant:
A. Who is charged with murder;
B. If the attorney for the State requests a Harnish bail proceeding for a defendant
charged with any other formerly capital offense; or
C. As otherwise provided in subsection 4.
2. Appointment of bail commissioners. The Chief Judge of the District Court may
appoint one or more residents of the State as bail commissioners. A bail commissioner
serves at the pleasure of the Chief Judge of the District Court, but no the term for which a
bail commissioner is appointed commissioner's appointment may not exceed 5 years. The
Chief Judge of the District Court shall require bail commissioners to complete the
necessary training requirements set out in this section. Bail commissioners have the powers
of notaries public to administer oaths or affirmations in carrying out their duties.
3. Immunity from liability of bail commissioners. A person appointed and serving
as a bail commissioner is immune from any civil liability, as are employees of
governmental entities under the Maine Tort Claims Act, Title 14, chapter 741 for acts
performed within the scope of the bail commissioner's duties.
4. Limitations on authority. A bail commissioner or bail officer may not:
A. Set preconviction bail for a defendant confined in jail or held under arrest by virtue
of any order issued by a court in which bail has not been authorized;
B. Change the amount of bail or bail conditions set by a court;
Page 1 - 132LR0527(01)

B-1. Set preconviction bail for a defendant alleged to have committed any of the
following offenses against a family or household member as defined in Title 19‑A,
section 4102, subsection 6:
(1) A violation of a protection from abuse order provision set forth in Title 19‑A,
former section 4006, subsection 5, paragraph A, B, C, D, E or F; Title 19‑A, former
section 4007, subsection 1, paragraph A, A-1, A-2, B, C, D, E or G; Title 19‑A,
section 4108, subsection 2, paragraph B, subparagraphs (1) to (6); or Title 19‑A,
section 4110, subsection 3, paragraph A, B, C, D, E, F, G or I;
(2) Any Class A, B or C crime under Title 17‑A, chapter 9;
(3) Any Class A, B or C sexual assault offense under Title 17‑A, chapter 11;
(4) Kidnapping under Title 17‑A, section 301;
(5) Criminal restraint under Title 17‑A, section 302, subsection 1, paragraph A,
subparagraph (4) or Title 17‑A, section 302, subsection 1, paragraph B,
subparagraph (2);
(6) Domestic violence stalking that is a Class C crime under Title 17‑A, section
210‑C, subsection 1, paragraph B;
(7) Domestic violence criminal threatening that is a Class C crime under Title
17‑A, section 209‑A, subsection 1, paragraph B or domestic violence criminal
threatening that is elevated to a Class C crime by the use of a dangerous weapon
under Title 17‑A, section 1604, subsection 5, paragraph A;
(8) Domestic violence terrorizing that is a Class C crime under Title 17‑A, section
210‑B, subsection 1, paragraph B or domestic violence terrorizing that is elevated
to a Class C crime by the use of a dangerous weapon under Title 17‑A, section
1604, subsection 5, paragraph A; or
(9) Domestic violence reckless conduct that is a Class C crime under Title 17‑A,
section 211‑A, subsection 1, paragraph B or domestic violence reckless conduct
that is elevated to a Class C crime by the use of a dangerous weapon under Title
17‑A, section 1604, subsection 5, paragraph A;
C. In a case involving domestic violence, set preconviction bail for a defendant before
making a good faith effort to obtain from the arresting officer, the responsible
prosecutorial office, a jail employee or other law enforcement officer:
(1) A brief history of the alleged abuser;
(2) The relationship of the parties;
(3) The name, address, phone number and date of birth of the victim;
(4) Existing conditions of protection from abuse orders, conditions of bail and
conditions of probation;
(5) Information about the severity of the alleged offense; and
(6) Beginning no later than January 1, 2015, the results of a validated, evidence-
based domestic violence risk assessment recommended by the Maine Commission
on Domestic and Sexual Abuse, established in Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection
Page 2 - 132LR0527(01)

411 74‑C, and approved by the Department of Public Safety conducted on the alleged
422 abuser when the results are available;
D. Set preconviction or post-conviction bail for a violation of condition of release
pursuant to section 1092, except as provided in section 1092, subsection 4;
E. Set preconviction bail using a condition of release not included in every order for
pretrial release without specifying a court date within 8 weeks of the date of the bail
order;
F. Set preconviction bail for crimes involving allegations of domestic violence without
specifying a court date within 5 weeks of the date of the bail order; or
G. Notwithstanding section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (9-A),
impose a condition of preconviction bail that a defendant submit to random search with
respect to a prohibition on the possession, use or excessive use of alcohol, cannabis or
illegal drugs.
5. Fees Bail commissioner fees. A bail commissioner is entitled to receive a fee not
to exceed $60 for the charges pursuant to which the defendant is presently in custody,
unless the defendant lacks the present financial ability to pay the fee. A defendant presently
in custody who is qualified to be released upon personal recognizance or upon execution
of an unsecured appearance bond, whether or not accompanied by one or more conditions
of bail that have been set by a judicial officer, but who in fact lacks the present financial
ability to pay a bail commissioner fee, must nonetheless be released upon personal
recognizance or upon execution of an unsecured appearance bond. A bail commissioner
may not refuse to examine a person to determine the person's eligibility for bail, set bail,
prepare the personal recognizance or bond or take acknowledgement of the person in
custody because the person in custody lacks the present financial ability to pay a bail
commissioner fee. The bail commissioner shall submit such forms as the Judicial
Department directs to verify the amount of fees received under this subsection. The sheriff
of the county in which the defendant is detained may create a fund for the distribution by
the sheriff or the sheriff's designee for the payment in whole or in part of the $60 bail
commissioner fee for those defendants who do not have the financial ability to pay that fee.
A bail commissioner fee under this subsection is not a financial condition of release for the
purposes of section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph B‑1.
6. Attorneys-at-law Bail commissioners; attorneys-at-law. No An attorney-at-law
who has acted as bail commissioner in any proceeding may not act as attorney for or on
behalf of any defendant for whom that attorney-at-law has taken bail in any such
proceeding, nor may any attorney-at-law who has acted as attorney for a defendant in any
offense act as bail commissioner in any proceeding arising out of the offense with which
the defendant is charged.
7. Mandatory training. As a condition of appointment and continued service, a bail
commissioner must successfully complete a bail training program, as prescribed and
scheduled by the Chief Judge of the District Court, not later than one year following
appointment. The Maine Criminal Justice Academy shall provide assistance to collaborate
with the Chief Judge of the District Court in establishing an appropriate training program
class for law enforcement officers regarding execution of bail commissioners bonds. The
program shall class must include instruction on the provisions of this chapter, the relevant
Page 3 - 132LR0527(01)

415 constitutional provisions on bail and any other matters pertinent to bail that the Chief Judge
426 of the District Court considers appropriate and necessary. The Maine Criminal Justice
437 Academy and the Chief Judge of the District Court may also establish a continuing
448 education program class for bail commissioners law enforcement officers.
8. Bail commissioners in indigent cases. The Chief Judge of the District Court may
adopt rules requiring a bail commissioner to appear and set bail regardless of whether the
defendant is indigent and unable to pay the bail commissioner's fee. The Chief Judge of the
District Court may also adopt rules governing the manner in which a bail commissioner is
paid in the event an indigent person is released on bail and is unable to pay the bail
commissioner's fee.
Sec. 5. 15 MRSA §1024, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 758, §20, is amended
to read:
Clerks of the District Court and clerks of the Superior Court, during the hours when
the clerk's office is open for business and subject to the control of the District Court Judge
or Superior Court Justice, may, without fee, take the personal recognizance of any
defendant for appearance on a charge of a Class D or Class E crime. Nothing in this section
may be construed to prohibit the appointment of any clerk of the District Court or the
Superior Court as a bail commissioner, except that no fee may be charged by the clerk
while the clerk's office is open for business.
Sec. 6. 15 MRSA §1025, as amended by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. B, §28 and affected
by Pt. D, §7 and c. 614, §9, is further amended to read:
§1025. Law enforcement officers
A law enforcement officer making a warrantless arrest under Title 17‑A, section 15
may, without fee, take the personal recognizance of any defendant for appearance on a
charge of a Class D or Class E crime as required by Title 15, section 1092, paragraph 4. If
authorized, a law enforcement officer may, without fee, take the personal recognizance
with deposit in accordance with Title 12, section 10353, subsection 2, paragraph C; and
Title 12, section 9707. The law enforcement officer's authority under this section continues
as long as the arrestee remains in the officer's custody.
If a court, bail commissioner or bail officer issues an order that a defendant in custody
be released pending trial, whether or not accompanied by one or more conditions under
section 1026, subsection 3, a law enforcement officer may, without fee, prepare the bond
and take the acknowledgment of the defendant.
Sec. 7. 15 MRSA §1025-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 508, §1, is further amended
to read:
§1025-A. County jail employees
If a court or, bail commissioner or bail officer issues an order that a defendant in
custody be released, pending trial, on personal recognizance or upon execution of an
unsecured appearance bond, whether or not accompanied by one or more conditions under
section 1026, subsection 3, an employee of the county jail having custody of the defendant,
if authorized to do so by the sheriff, may, without fee, prepare the personal recognizance
or bond and take the acknowledgment of the defendant.
Page 4 - 132LR0527(01)

Sec. 8. 15 MRSA §1026, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 299, §2, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (11) to read:
(11) Execute an agreement to forfeit, in the event of noncompliance, such
designated property, including money, as is reasonably necessary to ensure the
appearance of the defendant at the time and place required, to ensure that the
defendant will refrain from any new criminal conduct, to ensure the integrity of the
judicial process and to ensure the safety of others in the community and post with
an appropriate court such evidence of ownership of the property or such percentage
of the money as the judicial officer specifies. Whenever there is a financial
condition of bail, any money or cash bail may be paid with United States currency
or any other form of payment permitted by the Chief Judge of the District Court.
If payment is made by credit card, the court is authorized to impose, in addition to
the amount designated as bail, a surcharge in the amount equal to the service charge
to the court for accepting payment made by credit card;
Sec. 9. 15 MRSA §1026, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 397, §5 and c. 647,
Pt. B, §10 and affected by §65, is further amended to read:
4. Factors to be considered in release decision. In setting bail, the judicial officer
shall, on the basis of an interview with the defendant, information provided by the
defendant's attorney and, information provided by the attorney for the State or information
provided by an informed law enforcement officer if the attorney for the State is not
available and other reliable information that can be obtained, take into account the available
information concerning the following:
A. The nature and circumstances of the crime charged;
B. The nature of the evidence against the defendant; and
C. The history and characteristics of the defendant, including, but not limited to:
(1) The defendant's character and physical and mental condition;
(2) The defendant's family ties in the State;
(3) The defendant's employment history in the State;
(4) The defendant's financial resources, including the ability of the defendant to
afford a financial condition imposed by the judicial officer;
(5) The defendant's length of residence in the community and the defendant's
community ties;
(6) The defendant's past conduct;
(7) The defendant's criminal history, if any;
(8) The defendant's record concerning appearances at court proceedings;
(9) Whether, at the time of the current offense or arrest, the defendant was on
probation, parole or other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal or completion
of a sentence for an offense in this jurisdiction or another;
(9-A) Any evidence that the defendant poses a danger to the safety of others in the
community, including the results of a validated, evidence-based domestic violence
risk assessment recommended by the Maine Commission on Domestic and Sexual
Page 5 - 132LR0527(01)

412 Abuse, established in Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection 74‑C, and approved by
423 the Department of Public Safety;
(10) Any evidence that the defendant has obstructed or attempted to obstruct
justice by threatening, injuring or intimidating a victim or a prospective witness,
juror, attorney for the State, judge, justice or other officer of the court;
(11) Whether the defendant has previously violated conditions of release,
probation or other court orders, including, but not limited to, violating protection
from abuse orders pursuant to former Title 19, section 769 or Title 19‑A, former
section 4011 or Title 19‑A, section 4113;
(12) Whether the defendant is the person primarily responsible for the care of
another person;
(13) Whether the defendant has a specific health care need, including a mental
health care need, that is being met or would be better met outside of custody; and
(14) Whether being placed or remaining in custody would prevent the defendant
from maintaining employment.
Sec. 10. 15 MRSA §1028, as amended by PL 2015, c. 431, §12, is further amended
to read:
§1028. De novo determination of bail under section 1026
1. By defendant in custody. Any defendant who is in custody as a result of a decision
of a bail commissioner or bail officer acting under section 1026 may file a petition with the
Unified Criminal Docket for a de novo determination of bail. The bail commissioner or
bail officer making the decision shall advise the defendant of the right to obtain a de novo
determination.
A. If the defendant chooses to have a de novo determination of bail, the defendant
must be furnished with a petition and, upon execution of the petition and without the
issuance of any writ or other process, the sheriff of the county in which the decision
was made shall provide for the transportation of the defendant together with the petition
and all papers relevant to the petition or copies of the petition or papers to the court.
If no justice or judge will be available within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays
and holidays, arrangements must be made for a de novo determination of bail in the
nearest county in which a justice or judge is then sitting. The defendant's custodian
shall provide transportation to the court as required by this chapter without the issuance
of any writ or other process.
If there is no justice or judge available, the defendant must be retained in custody until
the petition can be considered.
B. The petition and such other papers as may accompany it must be delivered to the
clerk of the Unified Criminal Docket to which the defendant is transported and upon
receipt the clerk shall notify the attorney for the State. The court shall review the
petition de novo and set bail in any manner authorized by section 1026.
C. Upon receipt of a pro se petition or upon oral or written request of the attorney for
the defendant, the clerk shall set a time for hearing and provide oral or written notice
Page 6 - 132LR0527(01)

412 to the attorney for the State. The hearing must be scheduled for a time not less than 24
423 hours nor more than 48 hours after the clerk notifies the attorney for the State.
2. By defendant not in custody. Any defendant who is not in custody but who is
aggrieved by a decision of a bail commissioner or bail officer acting under section 1026 as
to the amount or conditions of bail set may file a petition with the Unified Criminal Docket
for a de novo determination of bail. A justice or judge shall review the petition de novo
and set bail in any manner authorized by section 1026. The petition must be considered as
scheduled by the clerk.
3. No further relief. The de novo determination by a justice or judge under this
section is final and no further relief is available.
Sec. 11. 15 MRSA §1092, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2013, c. 519, §3, is further
amended to read:
4. Limitations on authority of bail commissioner or bail officer to set bail. A court
may, but a bail commissioner or bail officer may not, set bail for a defendant granted
preconviction or post-conviction bail who has been arrested for an alleged violation of this
section if:
A. The condition of release alleged to be violated relates to new criminal conduct for
a crime classified as Class C or above or for a Class D or Class E crime involving
domestic violence, sexual assault pursuant to Title 17‑A, chapter 11 or sexual
exploitation of minors pursuant to Title 17‑A, chapter 12;
B. The underlying crime for which preconviction or post-conviction bail was granted
is classified as Class C or above; or
C. The underlying crime for which preconviction or post-conviction bail was granted
is a crime involving domestic violence, sexual assault pursuant to Title 17‑A, chapter
11 or sexual exploitation of minors pursuant to Title 17‑A, chapter 12.
If a bail commissioner or bail officer does not have sufficient information to determine
whether the violation of the condition of release meets the criteria set forth under this
subsection, the bail commissioner or bail officer may not set bail on the violation of the
condition of release.
Sec. 12. 15 MRSA §1096, first ¶, as amended by PL 2005, c. 449, §3, is further
amended to read:
A preconviction bail order of a bail commissioner or bail officer may be revoked by
any judge or justice, and a preconviction bail order of a judge or justice may be revoked by
any judge or justice of the same court, upon a determination made after notice and
opportunity for hearing that:
Sec. 13. 17-A MRSA §2108, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
3. Limited disclosure as part of bail condition or court order. A bail
commissioner, bail officer, judge, justice, court clerk, law enforcement officer or attorney
for the State may disclose a victim's current address or location to the defendant or accused
person, or the attorney or authorized agent of the defendant or accused person, as part of a
bail condition or court order restricting contact with the victim only when it is clear that
the defendant already knows the victim's current address or location or when the victim
Page 7 - 132LR0527(01)

414 requests that such bail condition or court order be issued and the victim requests that the
425 current address or location be specified. For purposes of this subsection, "bail officer" has
436 the same meaning as in Title 15, section 1003, subsection 1-A.
Sec. 14. 19-A MRSA §4114, sub-§6, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A, §3
and affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
E. Making a good faith effort to administer a validated, evidence-based domestic
violence risk assessment recommended by the Maine Commission on Domestic and
Sexual Abuse, established in Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection 74‑C, and approved
by the Department of Public Safety. The law enforcement officer administering this
assessment shall provide the results of the assessment to the bail commissioner or bail
officer, if appropriate, and the district attorney for the county in which the abuse took
place. For purposes of this paragraph, "bail officer" has the same meaning as in Title
15, section 1003, subsection 1-A.
Sec. 15. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 235, §§6 to
8, is further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) A process for the collection of information regarding the defendant that
includes the defendant's previous history, the parties' relationship, whether the
commission of an alleged crime included the use of strangulation as defined in
Title 17‑A, section 208, subsection 1, paragraph C, the name of the victim and a
process to relay this information to a bail commissioner or bail officer before a bail
determination is made. For purposes of this paragraph, "bail officer" has the same
meaning as in Title 15, section 1003, subsection 1-A;
Sec. 16. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 235, §§6 to
8, is further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) A process for the administration of a validated, evidence-based domestic
violence risk assessment recommended by the Maine Commission on Domestic
and Sexual Abuse, established in Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection 74‑C, and
approved by the Department of Public Safety and the conveyance of the results of
that assessment to the bail commissioner or bail officer, if appropriate, and the
district attorney for the county in which the domestic violence occurred; and